Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 7. Benefits.
Sec. 39.35.420.
Nonoccupational death benefits.

If the death of an employee occurs from nonoccupational causes after completing less than one year of credited service, the employee’s designated beneficiary shall be paid the balance of the employee contribution account. If the death of an employee occurs from nonoccupational causes after completing at least one year but less than five years of credited service, a death benefit shall be paid to the employee’s designated beneficiary. The amount of the death benefit shall be the amount set out in (c) of this section.

If the death of a vested member or deferred vested member occurs from nonoccupational causes and the member designated no person other than the surviving spouse as beneficiary to receive nonoccupational death benefits, the surviving spouse may elect to receive either the amounts set out in (c) of this section or a 50 percent joint and survivor option based on credited service to the date of the employee’s death or termination. Benefits accrue from the first day of the month following the employee’s death and are payable the last day of the month.

If, under AS

39.35.490

, a vested or deferred vested member designates as beneficiary to receive nonoccupational benefits someone other than the surviving spouse to whom the member has been married for at least one year, the administrator shall pay the designated beneficiary: (1) the balance of the deceased member’s employee contribution account; and (2) a lump-sum death benefit. The amount of the lump-sum death benefit is $100 times the years of credited service of the deceased member plus $1,000.

History.

(§ 23 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 12 ch 109 SLA 1970; am § 11 ch 159 SLA 1972; am § 22 ch 1 SLA 1974; am §§ 14, 15 ch 123 SLA 1976; am § 40 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 52 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 38 ch 117 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

Collateral references. —

67 C.J.S. Officers, § 320.

Sec. 39.35.430.
Occupational death benefit.

[Repealed, § 16 ch 123 SLA 1976.]

If (1) the death of an employee occurs before the employee’s retirement and before the employee’s normal retirement date, and (2) the proximate cause of death is a bodily injury sustained or a hazard undergone while in the performance and within the scope of the employee’s duties, and (3) the injury or hazard is not the proximate result of wilful negligence of the employee, a monthly survivor’s pension shall be paid to the surviving spouse. If there is no surviving spouse or if the spouse later dies, the monthly survivor’s pension shall be paid in equal parts to the dependent children of the employee. On the date the normal retirement of the employee would have occurred if the employee had lived, monthly payments shall equal the monthly amount of the normal retirement benefit to which the employee, had the employee lived and continued employment until the employee’s normal retirement date, would have been entitled with an average monthly compensation as existed at death and the credited service to which the employee would have been entitled.

The first payment of the surviving spouse’s pension or of a dependent child’s pension shall be made for the month following the month in which the employee dies and payment shall cease to be made beginning with the month in which there is no surviving spouse or no dependent child.

[Repealed, § 19 ch 123 SLA 1976.]

[Repealed, § 19 ch 123 SLA 1976.]

If the death of an employee occurs from occupational causes but no surviving spouse or dependent children exist at the time of the death or if the employee designates as beneficiary under AS

39.35.490

someone other than the surviving spouse or dependent children, the employee’s designated beneficiary is entitled to receive those benefits available to a beneficiary under AS

39.35.420(c)

and an occupational death benefit may not be paid to the surviving spouse or dependent children.

The monthly survivor’s pension in (b) of this section for survivors of employees who were not peace officers or firefighters is 40 percent of the employee’s monthly compensation in the month in which the employee dies. The monthly survivor’s pension in (b) of this section for survivors of employees who were peace officers or firefighters is the greater of

50 percent of the monthly compensation in the month in which the employee dies; or

75 percent of the employee’s retirement benefit calculated under the provisions of AS

39.35.370(c)

if the employee had survived to normal retirement age.

If an employee’s death is caused by an act of assault, assassination, or terrorism directly related to the person’s status as an employee, whether the act occurs on or off the employee’s job site, the death shall be considered to have occurred in the performance of and within the scope of the employee’s duties for purposes of (b)(2) of this section. If the expressed or apparent motive and intent of the perpetrator of the harm inflicted upon the employee was due to the performance of the employee’s job duties or employment, the death shall be considered to be directly related to the employee’s status as an employee. An employee’s job duties are those performed within the course and scope of the person’s employment with an employer.

History.

(§ 24 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 13 ch 109 SLA 1970; am § 23 ch 1 SLA 1974; §§ 16 — 19 ch 123 SLA 1976; am §§ 41, 42 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 39 ch 13 SLA 1980; am §§ 53, 54 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 39 ch 117 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 40 SLA 2002; am §§ 39, 40 ch 59 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (h) was enacted as subsection (g) and renumbered in 2002.

Editor’s notes. —

In general, a person’s right to benefits under the state’s public employee retirement systems vests when the person joins the system. Hammond v. Hoffbeck, 627 P.2d 1052 (Alaska 1981). Therefore, former law may govern the benefits of some members of the public employees’ retirement system. The user is advised to ascertain which version of the statute is applicable. Earlier versions of the statutes can be found in prior editions of the Alaska Statutes or in the published Session Laws of Alaska.

Sec. 39.35.440.
Death after occupational disability.

[Repealed, § 19 ch 123 SLA 1976.]

Upon the death of a disabled employee who is receiving or is entitled to receive an occupational disability benefit, the administrator shall pay the surviving spouse a surviving spouse’s pension, equal to 40 percent of the employee’s monthly compensation at the termination of employment because of occupational disability. If there is no surviving spouse, the administrator shall pay the survivor’s pension in equal parts to the dependent children of the employee. On the date the normal retirement of the employee would have occurred if the employee had lived, the administrator shall adjust the monthly payments to equal the monthly amount of the normal retirement benefit to which the employee, had the employee lived and continued employment until the employee’s normal retirement date, would have been entitled with an average monthly compensation as existed at death and the credited service to which the employee would have been entitled. If the death of an employee occurs from occupational causes but no surviving spouse or dependent children exist at the time of the death, or if the employee designates as beneficiary under AS

39.35.490

someone other than the surviving spouse or dependent children, the administrator shall pay the employee’s designated beneficiary those benefits available to a beneficiary under AS

39.35.420(c)

and may not pay an occupational death benefit to the surviving spouse or dependent children.

The first payment of the surviving spouse’s pension or of a dependent child’s pension shall accrue from the first day of the month following the employee’s death and is payable the last day of the month. The last payment shall be made for the last month in which there is an eligible surviving spouse or child.

[Repealed, § 55 ch 128 SLA 1977.]

History.

(§ 25 ch 143 SLA 1960; am §§ 14, 15 ch 109 SLA 1970; am §§ 19 — 21 ch 123 SLA 1976; am §§ 43, 44, 55 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 55 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 40 ch 117 SLA 1986)

Editor’s notes. —

In general, a person’s right to benefits under the state’s public employee retirement systems vests when the person joins the system. Hammond v. Hoffbeck, 627 P.2d 1052 (Alaska 1981). Therefore, former law may govern the benefits of some members of the public employees’ retirement system. The user is advised to ascertain which version of the statute is applicable. Earlier versions of the statutes can be found in prior editions of the Alaska Statutes or in the published Session Laws of Alaska.

Sec. 39.35.450.
Joint and survivor option.

Benefits payable under this section are in place of benefits payable under AS

39.35.370

,

39.35.385

, and former AS

39.35.460

. Upon filing an application with the administrator or when a disabled employee first attains eligibility for normal retirement under AS

39.35.400(f)

or

39.35.410(h)

, the employee shall designate the person who is the employee’s spouse at the time of appointment to retirement as the contingent beneficiary. However, if the designation of the spouse is revoked under (c) of this section, the employee may designate a dependent approved by the administrator as the contingent beneficiary or may take normal or early retirement under AS

39.35.370

or

39.35.385

or, if the employee was first hired before July 1, 1996, benefit payments under the level income option under former AS

39.35.460

. The administrator shall pay benefits under the option elected by the employee. The employee may elect an option that provides that the employee is entitled to receive a reduced benefit payable for life, and, after the employee’s death, the contingent beneficiary is entitled to payments in the amount of

75 percent of the reduced benefit payable for life; or

50 percent of the reduced benefit payable for life.

The aggregate of the pension payments expected to be paid to an employee and the contingent beneficiary under the options set out in (a) of this section shall be the actuarial equivalent of the pension that the employee is otherwise entitled to receive upon retirement.

An employee may elect or change an option without the approval of the administrator if the election or change is filed in writing with the administrator before the effective date of the employee’s retirement. An employee may revoke a joint and survivor option if the employee files with the administrator before the effective date of the employee’s retirement a revocation and consent to the revocation signed by the employee’s present spouse and each person entitled to benefits under a qualified domestic relations order on forms provided by the administrator. The administrator may waive the requirement for written consent from

a person entitled under the order if the person cannot be located or for another reason established by regulation; or

the spouse if

the employee is not married;

the employee was not married to the spouse during any period of the employee’s employment with an employer;

the spouse has no rights to the option because of the terms of a qualified domestic relations order;

the spouse cannot be located;

the employee and the spouse have been married for less than two years and the employee establishes that they are not cohabiting; or

another reason is established under regulations of the administrator.

A member, including a deferred vested member, may, regardless of age, elect a joint and survivor option any time before appointment to receive a retirement benefit.

If either the employee or contingent beneficiary dies before the employee is appointed to retirement, the election becomes inoperative. Once the employee is appointed to retirement, the election is irrevocable. If a retired employee is reemployed and is subsequently reappointed to retirement, those benefits earned during the period of reemployment are subject to the initial election made under this section, unless the contingent beneficiary is deceased. If the contingent beneficiary is deceased, the benefits earned during the period of reemployment are subject to AS

39.35.370

or this section if another contingent beneficiary was elected during the period of reemployment. All other benefits earned during prior periods of employment are subject to the election at the time the employee was appointed to retirement. If death occurs from nonoccupational causes during the period of reemployment, those benefits earned while reemployed are subject to AS

39.35.420(b)

. All other benefits earned during prior periods of employment are subject to the election at the time the employee was appointed to retirement. If death occurs from occupational causes during the period of reemployment, all benefits earned during all periods of employment are subject to AS

39.35.430(b)

and (c).

The employee and any person claiming to be a contingent beneficiary shall file with the administrator a marriage certificate, divorce or dissolution judgment, or other evidence necessary to determine the applicability of this section and the identity of any contingent beneficiary.

If the administrator determines, based on the affidavit of the employee and other evidence that an employee is eligible to elect a form of payment other than a joint and survivor option under this section, and no contrary evidence is presented to the administrator within 60 days after the effective date of the employee’s retirement, a claim under this section, made by a spouse or former spouse of the member, may not be paid if payment would result in an increase in actuarial liability to the plan.

If an employee fails to elect an option under this section, and if no effective revocation is filed with the administrator, the employee is considered to have elected the option provided in (a)(2) of this section.

History.

(§ 26 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 8 ch 235 SLA 1968; am § 12 ch 159 SLA 1972; am §§ 24 — 26 ch 1 SLA 1974; am § 6 ch 81 SLA 1976; am § 45 ch 128 SLA 1977; am §§ 41 — 43 ch 117 SLA 1986; am § 15 ch 4 FSSLA 1996; am § 43 ch 68 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 44, ch. 4, FSSLA 1996 provides that nothing in that Act, which amended subsection (a), “modifies or terminates the terms of a collective bargaining agreement in effect on July 1, 1996.” Under § 45, ch. 4, FSSLA 1996, the provisions of that Act, which amended subsection (a), are not severable, notwithstanding AS

01.10.030

.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A qualified domestic relations order that names a member’s ex-wife as the member’s survivor is valid and should be accepted, and does not improperly eliminate the survivor rights of the member’s future spouse, should he remarry before retirement. Oct. 2, 2002, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 39.35.451.
Spouse survivor benefits under Public Employees Retirement Act of 1949. [Repealed, § 47 ch 59 SLA 2002.]

Sec. 39.35.455.
Rights under qualified domestic relations order.

A former spouse shall be treated as a spouse or surviving spouse to the extent required by a qualified domestic relations order.
Rights under the order do not take effect until the order is filed with the administrator.

History.

(§ 44 ch 117 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

Sec. 39.35.460.
Level income option. [Repealed, § 20 ch 4 FSSLA 1996.]

Sec. 39.35.470.
Other forms of payment. [Repealed, § 85 ch 59 SLA 1982; § 75 ch 137 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 39.35.475.
Post-retirement pension adjustment.

Once each year the administrator shall increase benefit payments to eligible disabled members, to persons age 60 or older receiving benefits under this plan in the preceding calendar year, and to persons who have received benefits under this plan for at least five years who are not otherwise eligible for an increase under this section.

The increase in benefit payments applies to total benefit payments except for the cost-of-living allowance under AS

39.35.480

. The amount of the increase is a percentage of the current benefit equal to

the lesser of 75 percent of the increase in the cost of living in the preceding calendar year or nine percent, for recipients who on July 1 are at least 65 years old and for members receiving disability benefits; and

the lesser of 50 percent of the increase in the cost of living in the preceding calendar year or six percent, for recipients who on July 1 are at least 60 but less than 65 years old or for recipients who are less than 60 years old on July 1 but who have received benefits from the plan for at least five years.

If a recipient was not receiving benefits during the entire preceding calendar year, the increase in benefits under this section shall be adjusted by multiplying it by the fraction whose numerator is the number of months for which benefits were received in the preceding calendar year and whose denominator is 12.

If at the time of first receiving a retirement benefit a member was receiving a disability benefit under this plan, the administrator shall, at the time the member is appointed to retirement, increase the retirement benefit by a percentage equal to the total cumulative percentage increase that has been applied to the member’s disability benefit under this section.

When computing an occupational death benefit under AS

39.35.430

or

39.35.440

or a survivor’s benefit under AS

39.35.450

, adjustments granted to the deceased member or survivor under this section shall be included.

An increase in benefit payments under this section is effective July 1 of each year and is based on the percentage increase in the consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical workers for Anchorage, Alaska during the previous calendar year as determined by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.

History.

(§ 9 ch 235 SLA 1968; am § 14 ch 159 SLA 1972; am § 34 ch 146 SLA 1980; am § 57 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 41 ch 82 SLA 1986; am § 112 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

In general, a person’s right to benefits under the state’s public employee retirement systems vests when the person joins the system. Hammond v. Hoffbeck, 627 P.2d 1052 (Alaska 1981). Therefore, former law may govern the benefits of some members of the teachers’ retirement system. The user is advised to ascertain which version of a particular statute is applicable. The version of this statute that was in effect immediately after the 1980 amendments read as follows:

“Sec. 39.35.475. POST RETIREMENT PENSION ADJUSTMENT. (a) When the administrator determines that the cost of living has increased and that the financial condition of the retirement fund permits, he shall increase benefit payments to persons receiving benefits under this system.

“(b) The amount of the increase in benefit payments may not exceed the greater of

“(1) the increase in the cost of living since the date of retirement; or

“(2) four percent of the retirement benefit compounded for each year of retirement.

“(c) If at the time of first receiving a retirement benefit a member was receiving a disability benefit under this system, the administrator shall include the time during which the member received the disability benefit in determining the number of years of retirement under this section.

“(d) An increase in benefit payments under this section is effective July 1 of the year for which the increase is granted.

“(e) The administrator shall implement this section by regulation.”

The 1982 amendment, effective July 1, 1982, substituted “lesser” for “greater” in the introductory language of subsection (b).

Section 49, ch 146, SLA 1980 provides: “The retirement benefit payable to a member of the public employees’ retirement system who is receiving a normal retirement benefit under AS

39.35.370

, July 1, 1980, and who at the time of his retirement was receiving a disability pension under the public employees’ retirement system, shall be increased by a percentage equal to the percentage of all post-retirement pension adjustments payable under AS

39.35.475

during the period that the member was receiving a disability benefit.”

Under § 112, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, following amendment by sec. 34, ch. 146, SLA 1980, and until amended by sec. 41, ch. 82, SLA 1986, (a) of this section read: “(a) When the administrator determines that the cost of living has increased and that the financial condition of the retirement fund permits, the administrator shall increase benefit payments to persons receiving benefits under this plan. For purposes of this subsection, the financial condition of the fund would only permit an increase in benefits when the ratio of total fund assets to the accrued liability meets or exceeds 105 percent. In this subsection, “accrued liability” means the present value of all member benefits accrued by member service in this plan.”

Collateral references. —

Validity of legislation providing for additional retirement allowances for public employee previously retired, 27 ALR2d 1442.

Sec. 39.35.480.
Cost-of-living allowance.

While residing in the state, a person receiving a benefit under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

who is 65 years of age or older or who is receiving a disability benefit is entitled to receive a monthly cost-of-living allowance in addition to the basic benefit. The amount of this allowance shall be $50 or 10 percent of the basic benefit, whichever is greater.

A person receiving a cost-of-living allowance under this section shall notify the administrator when the person expects to be absent from the state for a continuous period that exceeds 90 days. After that notification, the person is no longer entitled to receive the monthly cost-of-living allowance, except that a person may be absent from the state for not more than six months without loss of the cost-of-living allowance if the absence is the result of illness and required by order of a licensed physician. Upon returning to the state, and upon notification to the administrator, the person is again entitled to receive the monthly cost-of-living allowance, commencing with the first monthly benefit payment made after notification of the person’s return.

While residing in the state, a public employee of the Territory of Alaska who participated in the Public Employees’ Retirement Act established by ch. 41 SLA 1949, and who retired before June 22, 1951, is entitled to the cost-of-living allowance equal to 25 percent of the amount received under ch. 41 SLA 1949.

For purposes of this section, “residing in the state” means domiciled and physically present in the state. A person’s status as “residing in the state” does not change if the person is absent from the state for a continuous period of

90 days or less;

six months or less, when ordered by a physician to be absent from the state; or

any length of time while the person is a member of a reserve or auxiliary component of the armed forces of the United States, including the organized militia of Alaska, consisting of the Alaska National Guard, the Alaska Naval Militia, and the Alaska State Defense Force, and is called to active duty by the appropriate state or federal authority.

History.

(§ 29 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 109 SLA 1967; am § 27 ch 1 SLA 1974; am § 108 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 46 ch 128 SLA 1977; am §§ 12, 13 ch 82 SLA 1979; am § 42 ch 82 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 70 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 57, ch. 82, SLA 1986 provides:
“Sections 16, 22-23, 25-27, 42-45, and 50 of this Act apply only to members first hired under the Public Employees’ Retirement System after June 30, 1986.”

Sec. 39.35.485.
Minimum benefit.

An employee who is eligible for a benefit calculated in accordance with AS

39.35.370(c)

is entitled to a benefit of at least $25 a month for each year of credited service, not including adjustments made under AS

39.35.340

for military service, AS

39.35.360

for credit for earlier service, AS

39.35.370(c)

for early retirement, AS

39.35.420

for nonoccupational death benefits, AS

39.35.450

for the survivor’s option, former AS

39.35.460

for the level income option, AS

39.35.475

for the post-retirement pension adjustment, and AS

39.35.480

for the cost of living.

[Repealed, § 55 ch 128 SLA 1977.]

History.

(§ 15 ch 159 SLA 1972; am § 16 ch 47 SLA 1974; am § 14 ch 205 SLA 1975; am § 24 ch 123 SLA 1976; am § 55 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 35 ch 146 SLA 1980; am § 58 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 16 ch 4 FSSLA 1996; am § 113 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Editor’s notes. —

Chapter 205, SLA 1975, which amended this section, was submitted to the voters by referendum and was rejected.

Sec. 39.35.490.
Designation of beneficiary.

Each employee shall designate the beneficiary or beneficiaries to whom the administrator shall distribute benefits payable under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

as a consequence of the employee’s death. Notwithstanding a previous designation of beneficiary, a person who is the spouse of an employee at the time of the employee’s death automatically becomes the designated beneficiary if the spouse was married to the employee during part of the employee’s employment for an employer

except to the extent a qualified domestic relations order filed with the administrator provides for payment to a former spouse or other dependent of the employee; or

unless the employee files a revocation of beneficiary accompanied by a written consent to the revocation signed by the present spouse and each person entitled under the order; however, consent of the present spouse is not required if the member and the present spouse had been married for less than two years on the date of the member’s death and if the member established when filing the revocation that the member and the present spouse were not cohabiting.

Except as provided in (a) of this section, the designation may be changed or revoked by the employee without notice to the beneficiary or beneficiaries at any time. If an employee designates more than one beneficiary, each shares equally unless the employee specifies a different allocation or preference. The designation of beneficiary, a change or revocation of a beneficiary, or a consent to a revocation of a beneficiary shall be made on a form provided by the administrator and is not effective until filed with the administrator.

If an employee fails to designate a beneficiary, or if no designated beneficiary survives the employee, the administrator shall pay the death benefit

to the surviving spouse or, if there is none surviving,

to the surviving children in equal parts or, if there is none surviving,

to the surviving parents in equal parts or, if there is none surviving,

to the employee’s estate.

A person claiming entitlement to benefits payable under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

as a consequence of an employee’s death shall provide the administrator with a marriage certificate, divorce or dissolution decree, or other evidence of entitlement. Documents establishing entitlement may be filed with the administrator immediately after a change in the employee’s marital status. If the administrator does not receive notification of a claim before the date 10 days after the employee’s death, the person claiming entitlement to the benefits is not entitled to receive from the division of retirement and benefits any benefit already paid by the administrator.

History.

(§ 30 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 47 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 59 ch 137 SLA 1982; am §§ 45, 46 ch 117 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A qualified domestic relations order that names a member’s ex-wife as the member’s survivor is valid and should be accepted, and does not improperly eliminate the survivor rights of the member’s future spouse, should he remarry before retirement. Oct. 2, 2002, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 39.35.495.
Time limit for application.

If no application for benefits or for refund has been filed with the administrator by July 1 following the date on which an inactive member, except an employee on leave-without-pay status or on layoff status, would attain age 75, or if no application for benefits or for refund has been filed with the administrator within the 50 years following the most recent date on which the employee was an active member, benefits or refunds may not be paid under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

and the member’s records may be destroyed.

History.

(§ 40 ch 13 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter” in this section.

Sec. 39.35.500.
Safeguard of employee funds held by the plan; transfer to other plans.

Except as provided in AS

29.45.030(a)(1)

or in (b) of this section, employee contributions and other amounts held in the plan are exempt from Alaska state and local taxes. Except as provided in this subsection and in (b) of this section, amounts held on behalf of, or payable to, any employee or other person who is or may become eligible for benefits under the plan are not subject to anticipation, alienation, sale, transfer, assignment, pledge, encumbrance, or charge of any kind, either voluntary or involuntary, before being received by the person entitled to the amount under the terms of the plan. An attempt to anticipate, alienate, sell, transfer, assign, pledge, encumber, charge, or otherwise dispose of a right to amounts held under the plan is void. However, an employee’s right to receive benefits or the member’s employee contribution account may be assigned

under a qualified domestic relations order; or

to a trust or similar legal device that meets the requirements for a Medicaid-qualifying trust under AS

47.07.020(f)

and 42 U.S.C. 1396p(d)(4).

An inactive member may elect to have the taxable portion of an inactive employee contribution account transferred directly to another plan or an individual retirement arrangement qualified under the federal Internal Revenue Code that accepts the transfer.

History.

(§ 39 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 10 ch 235 SLA 1968; am § 48 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 7 ch 62 SLA 1982; am § 47 ch 117 SLA 1986; am § 30 ch 106 SLA 1988; am § 18 ch 31 SLA 1992; am § 16 ch 102 SLA 1994; am §§ 44, 45 ch 68 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, “AS

29.45.030(a)(1)

” was substituted for “AS

29.45.030(a)(1)

(D)” to correct a manifest error in § 18, ch. 31, SLA 1992.

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

Sec. 39.35.505.
Exemption of employee funds and benefits.

Employee contributions and other amounts held in the plan and retirement benefits payable under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

are exempt from levy to enforce the collection of a debt as provided in AS 09.38 (exemptions).

History.

(§ 7 ch 62 SLA 1982; am § 31 ch 106 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

39.35.500(b)

. Renumbered in 1982.

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter” and “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Sec. 39.35.510.
Voluntary waiver of benefits.

A retired employee may, in writing, request the administrator to suspend, for any period of time, payment of all or part of the benefits to which the employee is entitled.
The administrator shall grant the request and may not require the retired employee to disclose a reason for desiring the suspension. Amounts that are suspended pursuant to the request are forfeited.
The retired employee may subsequently terminate the suspension by filing a written notice with the administrator that states a desire to revoke the suspension. Upon receipt of the notice, the administrator shall authorize resumption of the retired employee’s regular pension payments.

History.

(§ 40 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 49 ch 128 SLA 1977)

Sec. 39.35.520.
Adjustments.

When a change or error is made in the records maintained by the plan or in the contributions made on behalf of an employee or an error is made in computing a benefit, and, as a result, an employee or beneficiary is entitled to receive from the plan more or less than the employee would have been entitled to receive had the records or contributions been correct or had the error not been made, (1) the records, contributions, or error shall be corrected, and (2) as far as practicable, future payments or benefit entitlement shall be adjusted so that the actuarial equivalent of the pension or benefit to which the employee or beneficiary was correctly entitled shall be paid. An adjustment to contributions shall be picked up by the employer under AS

39.35.160

or treated as an adjustment to the employer’s contributions under AS

39.35.255

, depending upon the nature of the adjustment. If no future payment is due, a person who was paid any amount to which the person was not entitled is liable for repayment of that amount, and a person who was not paid the full amount to which the person was entitled shall be paid the balance of that amount.

An adjustment that requires the recovery of benefits may not be made under this section if

the incorrect benefit was first paid two years or more before the member or beneficiary was notified of the error;

the error was not the result of erroneous information supplied by the member or beneficiary; and

the member or beneficiary did not have reasonable grounds to believe that the amount of the benefit was in error.

At least quarterly, the administrator shall report to the commissioner of administration on all situations since the administrator’s last report in which an adjustment has been prohibited under (b) of this section. If the commissioner of administration finds that there is reason to believe that one or more of the conditions set out in (b) of this section have not been met, the administrator shall notify the member or beneficiary that an adjustment will be made to recover the overpayment. A member or beneficiary who receives notice of adjustment under this subsection may file a request with the commissioner of administration for a waiver of the adjustment under AS

39.35.522

. An adjustment may not be required while the waiver request is pending.

The plan shall pay interest on amounts owed to a member or beneficiary. Interest shall be charged on amounts owed to the plan by a member or beneficiary if the amount owed is the result of erroneous information supplied by the member or beneficiary, or the member or beneficiary had reasonable grounds to believe the amount of the benefit was in error. The interest paid under this subsection is at the rate established by regulation for indebtedness contributions owed. Interest accrues from the date on which the correct payment was due and continues until an actuarial adjustment to the benefit is effective or the amount owed is paid. Accrued interest in amounts less than the limit established in regulation for writing off small indebtedness and refund balances may not be collected or paid under this subsection.

History.

(§ 42 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 81 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 15 SLA 1984; am § 43 ch 82 SLA 1986; am § 41 ch 59 SLA 2002; am §§ 114, 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 14 ch 13 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 114, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, amended (c) of this section; sec. 132 of the same Act repealed that subsection.
The actions had the same effective date.
The legislative history of Senate Bill 141, the source of the Act, suggests that the proposed amendment of (c) of this section by the House State Affairs Committee was intended to effect change of the Senate-passed bill.
The Senate-passed bill had proposed to repeal subsection (c), thereby eliminating independent review of recovery of benefits that had been allegedly paid in error.
The House committee proposed to retain provisions relating to waiver and adjustment of benefits allegedly paid in error. The committee’s version amended subsection (c) to provide a mechanism by which review or oversight would continue notwithstanding the Act’s elimination of the Public Employees’ Retirement Board that had considered them, but failed to eliminate the reference to (c) in the bill section calling for the subsection’s repeal.
Under AS

01.05.031(b)(7)

, to correct a manifest error by way of a neglected deletion and to give effect to the language added by the House, to which the Senate later agreed, the conflicting provision that repeals subsection (c) is not given effect.

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

Although § 57, ch. 82, SLA 1986 provided that the amendment to this section made by § 43, ch. 82, SLA 1986, which added subsection (d), applied only to members first hired under the Public Employees’ Retirement System after June 30, 1986, § 57, ch. 82, SLA 1986 was amended by § 34, ch. 106, SLA 1988 to delete § 43, ch. 82, SLA 1986 from the sections applicable only to members first hired after June 30, 1986.